Illinois, session 104th, HB5785.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Surplus Funds Limitation Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Tax collections" means the aggregate amount collected by 8the taxing district from property taxes and other taxes 9imposed by the taxing district, but not including any fines or 10fees imposed by the taxing district.11    "Taxing district" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 1-150 of the Property Tax Code. 13    Section 10. Limit on surplus funds. For fiscal years 14beginning on or after July 1, 2026, no taxing district, other 15than a municipality with a population of less than 10,000 16inhabitants, may hold more than 200% of the amount of the 17municipality's tax collections from the previous fiscal year 18in cash or cash-equivalent assets. If, at the end of any fiscal 19quarter, the taxing district has more than that amount in cash 20or cash-equivalent assets, then the excess amount shall be 21refunded to taxpayers pro rata based on each taxpayer's 22percentage of the total levy for the previous year.   HB5785- 2 -LRB104 21571 HLH 36997 b1    Section 15. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 2tax collections in a manner that is inconsistent with this 3Act. This Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 4of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 5exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 6by the State. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.